Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
624

DEPOSITIONS
AND DISCOVERY

Section

624-1, 2 Repealed

624-11 to 19 Repealed

Part I. General Provisions

624-21 to 23 Repealed

624-24 Arbitrators, etc.

624-24.5 Compelling attendance of witness;
commission for

taking testimony

624-25 Discovery

624-25.5 Proceedings and records of peer review
committees and

quality assurance committees

Part II. Depositions for Use Outside the
State

624-26 Repealed

624-27 Subpoena to witness

624-28 Taking and return of deposition

624-31 to 34 Repealed

Part III. Costs

624-35 Costs

Part IV. Perpetuation of Testimony

624-41 Action for

624-42 to 44 Repealed

624-45 Costs

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1972, c 143, §1(k).

Rules of Court

See HRCP chapter V and rules 45(d) and 81(g); HRPP rules 15,
16; DCRCP chapter V and rule 45(d); RCC rule 16; RDC rule 16; Hawaii Family
Court Rules, part A(V).

Law Journals and Reviews

Pre-Trial Discovery: Change in the Federal Rules. 7 HBJ,
no. 2, at 48 (1970).

Electronic Discovery: A Call for a New Rules Regime for the
Hawai‘i Courts. 32 UH L. Rev. 153 (2009).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next